Hawaii statutes.
§514A-19 Merger of increments. (a)
Two or more condominium projects, whether or not adjacent to one another, but
which are part of the same incremental plan of development and in the same
vicinity, may be merged together so as to permit the joint use of the common
elements of the projects by all the owners of the apartments in the merged
projects. The merger documents may provide for a single association of
apartment owners and board of directors for the merged projects and for a
sharing of the common expenses of the projects among all the owners of the
apartments in the merged projects.

(b) Upon the recording in the office of the
assistant registrar of the land court of the State of Hawaii of a certificate
of merger that indicates that the fee simple title to the lands of the merged
projects are merged, the assistant registrar shall cancel all existing
certificates of title for the apartments in the condominium projects being
merged and shall issue new certificates of title for the apartments in the merged
project, covering all of the land of the merged condominium projects. The new
certificates of title for the apartments in the merged condominium project
shall describe, among other things, the new undivided interest in the land
appertaining to each apartment in the merged condominium projects. The
certificate of merger shall at least set forth all of the apartments of the
merged condominium projects, their new undivided interest, and their current
certificate of title numbers in the common elements of the merged condominium
projects. [L 1977, c 98, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 18, §6]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next